Arkansas, session 2025, HB1643.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 11-3-204(a)(1), concerning the information
that may be disclosed by a current or former employer to a prospective
employer, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) A current or former employer may disclose the following
information about a current or former employee's employment history to a
prospective employer of the current or former employee upon receipt of
written consent from the current or former employee:
(A) Date and duration of employment;
(B) Current pay rate and wage history;
(C) Job description and duties;
*CEB135*
03/03/2025 1:07:30 PM CEB135

HB1643
(D) The last written performance evaluation prepared prior
to the date of the request;
(E) Attendance information;
(F) Results of drug or alcohol tests administered within
one (1) year prior to the request;
(G) Threats of violence, harassing acts, or threatening
behavior related to the workplace or directed at another employee;
(H) A substantiated allegation of sexual abuse or sexual
harassment by the employee, or the resignation by a former employee during a
pending investigation of an allegation of sexual abuse or sexual harassment
against the former employee;
(I) Whether the employee was voluntarily or involuntarily
separated from employment and the reasons for the separation; and
(I)(J) Whether the employee is eligible for rehire.






















03/03/2025 1:07:30 PM CEB135